test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-kärpäin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kärpäin: # Noun 'fly'
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Nom: kärpäin
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Gen: kärpäisen
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Acc: kärpäisen
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Part: kärpäistä
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Ill: kärpäisee
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Ine: kärpäisees
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Ela: kärpäisest
     kärpäin+N+Sg+All: kärpäiselle
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Ade: kärpäiseel
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Abl: kärpäiselt
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Tra: kärpäiseks
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Ess: kärpäisennä
     kärpäin+N+Sg+Exe: kärpäisent

     kärpäin+N+Pl+Nom: kärpäiset
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Gen: kärpäisiin
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Acc: kärpäiset
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Part: kärpäisiä
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Ill: kärpäisii
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Ine: kärpäisiis
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Ela: kärpäisist
     kärpäin+N+Pl+All: kärpäisille
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Ade: kärpäisiil
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Abl: kärpäisilt
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Tra: kärpäisiks
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Ess: kärpäisinnä
     kärpäin+N+Pl+Exe: kärpäisint
